Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201749-14,142
Payment of civil penalty.

No person shall be appointed to any elective or appointive office specified in section 49-1493 until he or she has first paid any outstanding civil penalties and interest imposed pursuant to the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act.

Laws 2017, LB85, § 4.
August 24, 2017